Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1206 Publication by clerk of
appointment as personal representative; notice to creditors, heirs, etc.
(a) If the estate has a total value of $10,000 or less, upon such appointment
the clerk shall publish the fact by posting a notice thereof at the front
entrance of the court house of the judicial circuit and by advertising the
notice in the English language at least once in a newspaper of general
circulation in the judicial circuit, the notice to state briefly that all
creditors of the deceased must file with the clerk duly verified claims within
sixty days from the date of publication, and that all persons claiming to be
heirs of the estate are requested to file with the clerk notice of such claims
within the period. The court may direct that the advertising of the notice in
a newspaper need not be made if it deems the same unnecessary.

(b) If the estate has a total value in excess
of $10,000, the content and method of giving notice, both of the pendency of
the action and of all other acts for which notice is required, shall be as
provided for informal probates in article III, part 3. [L 1996, c 288, pt of
§1]

Rules of Court

Notice, see Hawaii Probate Rules, part A(III); HPR
rule 51.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next